Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-227
Water in streams; measurement; duty of Chief Water Officer.

The Chief Water Officer shall measure or cause to be measured the quantity of water flowing in the several streams of the state, shall make a record thereof in the office of the department, and shall from time to time make such additional measurements as may be necessary, in considering applications for water appropriations and such controversies as may arise regarding the distribution of water.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. V, div. 2, § 8, p. 835;

C.S.1922, § 8427;

C.S.1929, § 81-6308;

R.S.1943, § 46-227;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 97;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 75.